Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-5204
Beginning Farmer
Board; created; duties.

For the purpose of developing and
directing programs to provide increased and enhanced opportunities for beginning
farmers and livestock producers, the Beginning Farmer Board is created. For
administrative and budgetary purposes only, the board shall be housed within
the Department of Agriculture. The board shall be vested with the following
duties and responsibilities:

(1) To approve and certify beginning farmers and livestock producers
as eligible for the programs provided by the board, for eligibility to claim
tax credits authorized by section 77-5209.01, and for eligibility to claim
an exemption of taxable tangible personal property tax as provided by section
77-5209.02;

(2) To approve and certify owners of agricultural assets as eligible
for the tax credits authorized by sections 77-5211 to 77-5213;

(3) To advocate joint ventures between beginning farmers or livestock
producers and existing private and public credit and banking licensed institutions,
as well as to advocate joint ventures with owners of agricultural assets desiring
to assist beginning farmers and livestock producers seeking entry into farming
or livestock production;

(4) To provide necessary and reasonable assistance and support to beginning
farmers and livestock producers for qualification and participation in financial
management programs approved by the board;

(5) To advocate appropriate changes in policies and programs of other
public and private institutions or agencies which will directly benefit beginning
farmers and livestock producers and may include changes regarding financing,
taxation, and any other existing policies which prohibit or impede individuals
from entering into farming or livestock production;

(6) To provide adequate explanations of facts and aspects of available
programs offered or recommended by the board intended for beginning farmers
and livestock producers;

(7) To assist and educate beginning farmers and livestock producers
by acting as a liaison between beginning farmers or livestock producers and
the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority;

(8) To encourage licensed financial institutions and individuals to
use alternative amortization schedules for loans and land contracts granted
to beginning farmers and livestock producers;

(9) To refer beginning farmers and livestock producers to agencies and
organizations which may provide additional pertinent information and assistance;

(10) To provide any other assistance and support the board deems necessary
and appropriate in order for entry into farming or livestock production;

(11) To adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry
out the purposes of the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act, including criteria
required for tax credit eligibility and financial management program certification
and guidelines which constitute a viably sized farm that is necessary to adequately
support a beginning farmer or livestock producer. Such guidelines shall vary
and take into account the region of the state, number of acres, land quality
and type, type of operation, type of crops or livestock raised, and other
factors of farming or livestock production; and

(12) To keep minutes of the board's meetings and other books and records
which will adequately reflect actions and decisions of the board and to provide
an annual report to the Governor, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, and the
Clerk of the Legislature by December 1. The
report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Clerk of the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 1223, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB1027, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 140.